Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 8. General Provisions.

Sec. 28.10.495.
Parking permit for vehicle transporting a person with a disability.

Upon application by a person with a disability, or by an organization that transports persons with disabilities, the department or a person authorized by the department shall issue to the applicant, without charge, a special permit bearing the control number of the applicant. The permit issued under this section, when displayed in the front windshield of a parked or standing vehicle, shall provide for special consideration by the public with respect to the parking or standing in designated spaces of a vehicle that is being used for the transportation of a person with a disability.

A person is not entitled to use the special permit provided for in (a) of this section except when providing transportation for a person with a disability. Upon the death of a person with a disability to whom a special permit has been issued, the special permit shall be returned to the department. If an organization to which a special permit has been issued ceases transporting persons with disabilities, or ceases operating, it shall return the special permit to the department.

Proof of disability, for the purpose of this section, shall be the same as that required for the purposes of AS

28.10.181(d)

.

History.

(§ 24 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1987; am §§ 7, 8 ch 20 SLA 1990; am § 62 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 56 SLA 2002)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 28.10.500.
Index of liens. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.501.
[Renumbered as AS 28.10.661.]

Sec. 28.10.502.
Towing, transporting, and storage lien.

A person engaged in the business of towing motor vehicles, who tows, transports, or stores a motor vehicle, has a possessory lien on the vehicle. This lien attaches when the person acts under a contract with the owner or at the direction of a public officer acting lawfully or a person entitled to possession of the property upon which the motor vehicle is parked without consent. The lien remains in effect while the motor vehicle is in the possession of the person, and the vehicle may be sold, as provided in (c) of this section, to pay the charges for towing, transportation or storage.

A lien under this section is limited to towing and storage charges and associated mailing fees. Unless a vehicle has already been reclaimed by the owner, the person possessing the vehicle under this section shall notify the registered owner and primary lienholder, if any, of the towing, transporting, or storage of the vehicle, by certified letter, return receipt requested, mailed to the registered owner and primary lienholder, if any, within seven working days after the initial towing, transporting, or storage of the vehicle. The letter shall be sent to the addresses of record of the registered owner and primary lienholder, if any, on file with the department or the corresponding office in another jurisdiction in which the title to the motor vehicle and the lien on it are recorded. Storage charges cease to be part of the lien after 60 days unless the registered owner or primary lienholder, if any, has been given actual notice of the possessory lien within that time or unless the certified letter has been mailed within the time required in this subsection.

If the motor vehicle remains unclaimed for a period of 30 days in the possession of the person who performed the towing, transportation or storage, it shall be sold on giving 20 days notice of the sale. The notice shall be delivered to the proper officer and personally served on the registered owner and all lienholders, if any, of the motor vehicle in the same manner as provided by law for service of summons. If either of these persons cannot be located and served personally, notice of the sale shall be forwarded to the registered owner and all lienholders, if any, at their last known address by certified mail, return receipt requested. This notice must contain a description of the motor vehicle, including its registration plate number and vehicle identification number, together with the time and place of sale, a statement of the amount due, and the name and address of the person to whom the charges are due.

The money realized from a sale made under this section shall be applied first to the payment of costs and expenses of the sale and secondly to the lawful charges of the person having a lien on the motor vehicle under this section. Remaining proceeds from the sale shall be retained by the department to be distributed to the registered and legal owner or lienholder entitled to the remaining proceeds. A purchaser in good faith of a titled motor vehicle sold under this section takes the motor vehicle free of any rights of prior lien.

History.

(§ 21 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 42 ch 37 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 99 §§ 43, 44 (1997); am § 2 ch 113 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 29, 2010, rewrote (b).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Towing businesses do not have the right to lawfully withhold possession of a vehicle until the owner pays a fee for a “DMV check” (determining from DMV the name and address of the registered owner).
July 1, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d, Garages, Service Stations, and Parking Facilities, § 113 et seq.

61A C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, § 1757 et seq.

Lien for towing or storage, ordered by public officer, of motor vehicle, 85 ALR3d 199.

Sec. 28.10.505.
Disclosure of personal information contained in motor vehicle records.

Notwithstanding AS

40.25.300

and except as provided in this section, the department may not disclose personal information contained in motor vehicle records maintained by the department under this chapter.

Personal information shall be disclosed for use in connection with matters of motor vehicle or driver safety or theft; motor vehicle emissions; motor vehicle product alterations, recalls, or advisories; performance monitoring of motor vehicles and dealers by motor vehicle manufacturers; and removal of nonowner records from the original owner records of motor vehicle manufacturers as required by federal law.

Personal information may be disclosed if the requesting person demonstrates, in a form and manner the department prescribes, that the requesting person has obtained the written consent of the person who is the subject of the information.

Personal information may be disclosed by the department upon proof of the identity of the person requesting a record and representation by the requesting person that the use of the personal information is strictly limited to one or more of the following uses:

for use by a government agency, including a court or law enforcement agency, in carrying out its functions, or a private person or entity acting on behalf of a government agency in carrying out its functions;

for use in the normal course of business by a legitimate business or an agent, employee, or contractor of the business, but only

to verify the accuracy of personal information submitted by an individual to the business or an agent, employee, or contractor of the business; and

if the information submitted is not correct, to obtain the correct information, but only for the purposes of preventing fraud by pursuing legal remedies against, or recovering on a debt or security interest against, an individual;

for use in connection with a civil, criminal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding in a court or government agency or before a self-regulatory body, including service of process and the execution or enforcement of a judgment or court order;

for use in research activities, or in producing statistical reports, if the personal information is not published, redisclosed, or used to contact an individual;

for use by an insurer or insurance support organization, or by a self-insured entity, or an agent, employee, or contractor of an insurer, in connection with claims investigation activities, anti-fraud activities, rating, or underwriting;

for use in providing notice to the owners of towed or impounded vehicles;

for use by an employer or an agent or insurer of an employer to obtain or verify information relating to a holder of a commercial driver’s license that is required under 49 U.S.C. 31101 — 31162 (Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act);

for use in connection with the operation of private toll transportation facilities;

for use in connection with a legitimate business operating under a contract with the department;

for bulk distribution for surveys, marketing, or solicitations if the person who is the subject of the information has provided written consent to the release; and

for any other purpose specifically authorized by law that is related to the operation of a motor vehicle or related to public safety.

Personal information contained in an individual record may be disclosed, without regard to the intended use of the personal information, if the person who is the subject of the information has provided written consent to the release.

In this section,

“disclose” means to engage in a practice or conduct that makes available or makes known personal information contained in records of the department about a person to another person, organization, or entity by any means of communication;

“individual record” means a record containing personal information about a designated person who is the subject of the record, as identified in a request for information;

“personal information” means information that identifies a person, including a name, address, telephone number, and medical or disability information, but does not include information on vehicular accidents, driving- or equipment-related violations, driver’s license or registration status, or a zip code.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 47 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in subsection (a), “AS

40.25.300

” was substituted for “AS

44.99.300

” to reflect the 2004 renumbering of AS

44.99.300

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the amendment of subsections (d) and (e) by §§ 1 and 2, ch. 47, SLA 2000 (HB 324), see 2000 House Journal 2060.

Secs. 28.10.510 — 28.10.540.
Liens; nonresident owners.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.550.
Notice of changes. [Repealed, § 20 ch 241 SLA 1976.]

Secs. 28.10.560,
28.10.570.
Evidence; enforcement.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.580.
Lists of vehicles. [Repealed, § 29 ch 214 SLA 1975.]

Secs. 28.10.590 — 28.10.660.
Miscellaneous offenses; general provisions. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.661.
Definitions.

In this chapter and in regulations adopted under this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“dealer” means a person engaged in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging vehicles of a type required to be registered under this chapter and who maintains a place of business or by word of mouth, advertising, or in any other manner represents to be in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging vehicles;

“manufactured home” has the meaning given in AS

45.29.102

;

“vehicle” includes mobile homes for the purposes of provisions relating to certificates of title; in this paragraph, “mobile home” means a manufactured home.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 1994; am §§ 20, 21 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

28.10.501

. Renumbered in 1984. Paragraph (2) was enacted as paragraph (3); renumbered in 2012 to maintain alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (2), added “; in this paragraph, “mobile home” means a manufactured home”; added (3).